Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.090

Fiscal agent for state.

The state treasurer shall be ex officio the fiscal agent of the state.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.08.090. Prior: 1891 c 138 s 1; RRS s 5484.]

NOTES:

Fiscal agencies: Chapter 43.80 RCW.